Utah statutes.
78B-2-101.   Definitions of "tax title" and "action."
(1)  The word "action" as used in this chapter includes counterclaims and
cross-complaints and all other civil actions in which affirmative relief is
sought.
(2)  The term "tax title" as used in Sections 59-2-1364 and 78B-2-206, and the
related amended Sections 78B-2-204, 78B-2-208, and 78B-2-214, means any title
to real property, whether valid or not, which has been derived through, or is
dependent upon, any sale, conveyance, or transfer of property in the course of
a statutory proceeding for the liquidation of any tax levied against the
property whereby the property is relieved from a tax lien.
